Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-104.02
Counties containing a city of the primary class; public grounds; powers.

Any county in which is located a city of the primary class shall have power to purchase, hold, and improve public grounds and parks within the limits of the county, to provide for the protection and preservation of the same, to provide for the planting and protection of shade or ornamental trees, to erect and construct or aid in the erection and construction of statues, memorials, and works of art upon any public grounds, and to receive donations and bequests of money or property for the above purposes in trust or otherwise.

Laws 1961, c. 83, § 1, p. 293.